Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
USED MOTOR VEHICLE SALES

42-6-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Owner" means the person who holds the legal title of a motor vehicle, but, in the event a motor vehicle is the subject of an agreement for the conditional sale or lease thereof, with the right to purchase upon the performance of the conditions stated in the agreement and with an immediate right to possession vested in the conditional vendee or lessee, or in the event a mortgagor of a vehicle is entitled to possession, then such conditional vendee, lessee, or mortgagor shall be deemed the owner.

"Person" means an individual, firm, association, corporation, or partnership.

"Private sale" means a sale or transfer of a used motor vehicle between two persons neither of whom is a used motor vehicle dealer.

"Retail used motor vehicle sale" means a sale or transfer of a used motor vehicle from a used motor vehicle dealer to a person other than a used motor vehicle dealer.

"Sale" means that the buyer of the used motor vehicle has paid the purchase price or, in lieu thereof, has signed a purchase contract or security agreement and has taken physical possession or delivery of the used motor vehicle.

"Sale between used motor vehicle dealers" means a sale or transfer of a used motor vehicle from one used motor vehicle dealer to another.

"Sale from an owner other than a used motor vehicle dealer to a used motor vehicle dealer" means any sale, trade-in, or other transfer of a used motor vehicle from a person other than a used motor vehicle dealer to a used motor vehicle dealer.

"Used motor vehicle" means every self-propelled motor vehicle having a gross weight of less than sixteen thousand pounds that has been sold, bargained for, exchanged, given away, leased, loaned, or driven as a "company executive car" or the title to which has been transferred from the person who first acquired it from the manufacturer or importer and it is so used as to have become what is commonly known as "secondhand" within the ordinary meaning thereof. A previously untitled motor vehicle that has been driven by the dealer for more than one thousand five hundred miles, excluding mileage incurred in the transit of the motor vehicle from the manufacturer to the dealer or from another dealer to the dealer, shall be considered a "used motor vehicle". This shall not apply to any automobile manufactured before January 1, 1942.

"Used motor vehicle dealer" means any licensed motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, or wholesaler as defined by section 44-20-102.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2469, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(8) amended, p. 558, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(9) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2067, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(9) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 143, § 25, effective October 1.

42-6-202. Prohibited acts.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise for sale, to sell, to use, or to install or to have installed any device which causes an odometer to register any mileage other than the true mileage driven. For purposes of this section, the true mileage driven is that mileage driven by the vehicle as registered by the odometer within the manufacturer's designed tolerance.

It is unlawful for any person or the person's agent to disconnect, reset, or alter the odometer of any motor vehicle with the intent to change the number of miles indicated thereon.

It is unlawful for any person, with the intent to defraud, to operate a motor vehicle on any street or highway knowing that the odometer of such vehicle is disconnected or nonfunctional.

Nothing in this part 2 shall prevent the service, repair, or replacement of an odometer, if the mileage indicated thereon remains the same as before the service, repair, or replacement. When the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before such service, repair, or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to read zero, and a notice in writing shall be attached to the left door frame of the vehicle by the owner or the owner's agent specifying the mileage prior to repair or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was repaired or replaced. Any removal or alteration of such notice so affixed is unlawful.

It is unlawful for any transferor to fail to comply with 49 U.S.C. sec. 32705 and any rule concerning odometer disclosure requirements or to knowingly give a false statement to a transferee in making any disclosure required by such law.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2470, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

(5) amended, p. 826, § 37, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-206 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-6-203. Penalty.

A violation of any of the provisions of section 42-6-202 is a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2471, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-207 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 1 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.

42-6-204. Private civil action.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, violates any requirement imposed under this part 2 shall be liable in an amount equal to the sum of:

Three times the amount of actual damages sustained or three thousand dollars, whichever is greater; and

In the case of any successful action to enforce said liability, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court.

An action to enforce any liability created under subsection (1) of this section must be brought within the time period prescribed in section 13-80-102, C.R.S.

There shall be no liability under this section if a judgment has been entered in federal court pursuant to section 409 of the "Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act", Public Law 92-513.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2471, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-208 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to section 409 of the "Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act", see 49 U.S.C. sec. 32710.

42-6-205. Consumer protection.

All provisions of section 6-1-708, C.R.S., concerning deceptive trade practices in the sale of motor vehicles shall apply to the sale of used motor vehicles.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2471, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 655, § 13, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-209 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-6-206. Disclosure requirements upon transfer of ownership of a salvage vehicle.

Prior to sale of a vehicle rebuilt from salvage to a prospective purchaser for the purpose of selling or transferring ownership of such vehicle, the owner shall prepare a disclosure affidavit stating that the vehicle was rebuilt from salvage. The disclosure affidavit shall also contain a statement of the owner stating the nature of the damage which resulted in the determination that the vehicle is a salvage vehicle. The words "rebuilt from salvage" shall appear in bold print at the top of each such affidavit.

Any person who sells a vehicle rebuilt from salvage for the purpose of transferring ownership of such vehicle shall:

Provide a copy of a disclosure affidavit prepared in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section to each prospective purchaser; and

Obtain a signed statement from each such purchaser clearly stating that the purchaser has received a copy of the disclosure affidavit and has read and understands the provisions contained therein.

Any person who purchases a vehicle rebuilt from salvage who was not provided with a copy of a disclosure affidavit prepared in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and who, subsequent to sale, discovers that the vehicle purchased was rebuilt from salvage shall be entitled to a full and immediate refund of the purchase price from the prior owner.

In the event a person is entitled to a refund under this subsection (3), the prior owner shall be required to make an immediate refund of the full purchase price to the purchaser. A signed statement from the purchaser prepared in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section shall relieve the prior owner of the obligation to make such refund.

Any owner, seller, or transferor of a vehicle rebuilt from salvage who fails to comply with the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine for a first offense not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars and a fine of five thousand dollars for each subsequent offense.

The executive director of the department of revenue shall prescribe rules and regulations for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Sale" means any sale or transfer of a vehicle rebuilt from salvage.

"Salvage vehicle" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 42-6-102 (17).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2472, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(6)(b) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1984, § 128, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-210 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-206 was relocated to § 42-6-202.